Louisiana, session 2026, SB80.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 51:2370.13, 2370.32(B), and 2370.41 are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§2370.13. Administration fee
The office may use up to one two and one-half percent of the appropriated
funds to administer the GUMBO 1.0 program. The office may use an additional one
two and one-half percent of the appropriated funds to hire third-party contractors
as deemed necessary for the further administration of the GUMBO 1.0 program. The
additional one two and one-half percent shall not be used as compensation for any
new or existing positions within the office.
* * *
§2370.32. Reimbursement for grantees
* * *
B.(1) Except as provided in Subsection C of this Section, the next ten percent
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 80 ENROLLED
of the subgrant award shall be provided based on provider certification and the
office's verification that ten percent of the eligible locations have been reached. The
remaining disbursements shall be given at the thresholds of completion of thirty-five
percent, sixty percent, eighty-five percent, and one hundred percent. The final
disbursement for one hundred percent completion shall be given only after
verification of one hundred percent deployment to eligible locations, within the
mandatory forty-eight-month maximum deadline, which may be extended up to a
year by the office or another shorter timeline certified by the applicant. The office
shall disburse funds only for completed deployments that comply with the terms
included in the successful application and shall withhold funds for failure to do so.
(2)(a) The office may withhold only the final payment to a provider, and
only in an amount equal to the unpaid portion of a final judgment by a court of
competent jurisdiction for damage to underground utilities or facilities
occurring during the course of a GUMBO 2.0 project, after a final
non-appealable adjudication determining that the provider is legally at fault for
such damage and has failed to timely satisfy the judgment.
(b) The office may require documentation of repairs, reimbursement of
damages, corrective action plans, utility coordination records, locate requests,
or other compliance measures prior to the release of withheld funds. Any
evidence gathered in the course of such administrative process, as well as any
findings of the office, shall not be admissible as evidence in any court of law.
(3)(a) The office shall not withhold any progress payment or interim
disbursement pursuant to this Section. The office may withhold only the final
disbursement or closeout payment of a GUMBO 2.0 grant, and only if such
withholding is authorized by rules promulgated in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act and only after completion of the regular notice,
public comment, and legislative oversight process applicable to rulemaking
pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act. Such rules shall include notice
to the grantee, a statement of the grounds for withholding, and an opportunity
for the grantee to cure or respond prior to final agency action.
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 80 ENROLLED
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the office may not
promulgate rules through emergency rulemaking, pursuant to R.S. 49:962, to
implement the provisions of this Paragraph.
* * *
§2370.41. GUMBO 3.0
A. In the event that there are remaining GUMBO 2.0 funds after the
obligation of infrastructure funds, the office of broadband development and
connectivity, which shall be referred to in this Subpart as "office", shall run a
grant program, nondeployment non-deployment, that will allow eligible parties
including but not limited to state agencies, nonprofits, for-profits, academic
institutions, and planning commissions to utilize these funds to help address
challenges in economic development, workforce development, health care,
cybersecurity, agriculture, and other sectors and industries of importance to the state
of Louisiana, as determined by approval of Volume 2 of Initial Proposal from the
office and the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, or IIJA, the Broadband Equity,
Access, and Deployment, or BEAD, Program, and the Notice of Funding
Opportunity, or NOFO, with an obligation deadline of these funds to be completed
no later than December 12, 2024. This program will be designated as "Granting
Unserved Municipalities Broadband Opportunities 3.0", and the office shall have the
authority to create appropriate rules and scoring criteria.
B. Grants solicited and awarded pursuant to the GUMBO 3.0 program
are subject to the provisions of the Louisiana Procurement Code, R.S. 39:1551
et seq., or the state Public Bid Law, R.S. 38:2181 et seq. Alternative
procurement methods consistent with the requirements defined by the assistant
secretary of the National Telecommunications and Information Administration,
or NTIA, of the United States Department of Commerce may be used to solicit
and award grants pursuant to the GUMBO 3.0 program if determined in
writing by the commissioner of administration to be in the best interest of the
state. The office may promulgate rules, after the NTIA releases non-deployment
guidance, that are consistent with the requirements promulgated by the
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 80 ENROLLED
assistant secretary pursuant to the IIJA, BEAD program guidelines, state law,
and this Subpart.
Section 2. R.S. 51:2370.51 is hereby repealed in its entirety.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.